Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 SF 2203 (3) 91 ss/ns/mb S.F. 2203 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 48A.25B Verification of 1 citizenship. 2 1. a. The state registrar of voters shall attempt to verify 3 all registered votersâ United States citizenship using the 4 systematic alien verification for entitlements system of the 5 United States citizenship and immigration services, or its 6 successor agency. The state registrar of voters shall provide 7 notice to each county commissioner of registration of the 8 results of the citizenship verification for each registrant in 9 the county commissionerâs county. 10 b. Upon receipt of a notification that a registrant has not 11 been verified as a United States citizen, a county commissioner 12 of registration shall designate the records of the registrant 13 as unconfirmed as provided in section 48A.37, subsection 2. 14 2. A county commissioner of registration shall send notice 15 to a registrant whose record has been designated as unconfirmed 16 pursuant to subsection 1 that includes all of the following: 17 a. An opportunity for the registrant to cancel the 18 registrantâs voter registration. 19 b. Instructions on how the registrant can provide proof of 20 citizenship to the county commissioner of registration. 21 c. Information on how to contact the United States 22 citizenship and immigration services, or its successor 23 agency, to correct information that the registrant believes is 24 inaccurate. 25 3. A registration that has been designated as unconfirmed 26 pursuant to subsection 1 shall be canceled pursuant to section 27 48A.30 if the registrant does not provide proof of citizenship 28 within ninety days of receiving a notice sent pursuant to 29 subsection 2. 30 4. The state registrar of voters shall, on a monthly basis, 31 verify the United States citizenship of all newly registered 32 voters as provided in subsection 1 and shall, on an annual 33 basis, verify the United States citizenship of all registered 34 voters as provided in subsection 1. 35 -1- SF 2203 (3) 91 ss/ns/mb 1/ 2 S.F. 2203 5. The state registrar of voters shall adopt rules pursuant 1 to chapter 17A to administer this section. 2 -2- SF 2203 (3) 91 ss/ns/mb 2/ 2